test/src/morphology/N-rubiizh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - rubīž: # Noun 143 'eng /est piir/fin' - full paradigm
     rubīž+N+Sg+Nom: rubīž
     rubīž+N+Sg+Gen: rubīž
     rubīž+N+Sg+Par: rubīžõ
     rubīž+N+Sg+Dat: rubīžõn
     rubīž+N+Sg+Ins: rubīžõks
     rubīž+N+Sg+Ill: rubīžõ
     rubīž+N+Sg+Ela: rubīžõst
     rubīž+N+Pl+Nom: rubīžõd
     rubīž+N+Pl+Gen: rubīžõ
     rubīž+N+Pl+Par: rubīžidi
     rubīž+N+Pl+Dat: rubīžõdõn
     rubīž+N+Pl+Ins: rubīžõdõks
     rubīž+N+Pl+Ill: rubīžiz
     rubīž+N+Pl+Ela: rubīžist
